Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2992.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; WORK ZONE SAFETY.new text end new text begin $300,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for additions and modifications to work zone design or layout to reduce vehicle speeds in a trunk highway work zone. This appropriation is available following a determination by the commissioner that the initial work zone design or layout is insufficient in providing for reduced vehicle speeds. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; SAFE ROAD ZONES.new text end new text begin (a) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for safety measures in safe road zones under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.065, that are on the trunk highway system. new text end new text begin (b) $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for safety measures in safe road zones under Minnesota Statutes, section 169.065. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; RURAL HIGH-RISK ROADS.new text end new text begin (a) $10,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the trunk highway fund to the commissioner of transportation for roadway design and related improvements on rural high-risk roads that improve safety, reduce speeds, and eliminate intersection interactions. The commissioner must identify roads based on crash information and in consultation with local traffic safety partners and the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety under Minnesota Statutes, section 4.076. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end new text begin (b) $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to law enforcement agencies to undertake enhanced safety enforcement efforts on rural high-risk roads, including enforcement related to speed, seat belt use, driver distraction, and impaired driving. The commissioner must identify enforcement locations based on crash information and consultation with local traffic safety partners and the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety under Minnesota Statutes, section 4.076. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; ADVISORY COUNCIL ON TRAFFIC SAFETY.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for traffic safety activities of the Advisory Council on Traffic Safety under Minnesota Statutes, section 4.076, including but not limited to traffic safety projects and nonfederal matches to federal grants. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; LAW ENFORCEMENT TRAFFIC SAFETY TRAINING.new text end new text begin $2,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to local units of government to provide training to peace officers on traffic safety enforcement. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SAFE AND SOBER RIDES HOME.new text end new text begin $500,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for grants to local units of government for safe ride programs that provide safe transportation options for patrons of hospitality and entertainment businesses within a community. new text end